Maryland, session 2026, HB1524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
3–103.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commissioner may conduct
an investigation to determine whether a provision of this title has been violated on the
Commissioner’s own initiative or may require a written complaint.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1524*

HOUSE BILL 1524
3–804.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHILD” MEANS AN ADOPTED, BIOLOGICAL, OR FOSTER CHILD OR
A STEPCHILD OR LEGAL WARD.
(3) “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED BY AN
EMPLOYER TO WORK FULL–TIME OR PART–TIME.
(4) “EMPLOYER” MEANS:
(I) A PERSON THAT:
1. EMPLOYS 15 OR MORE INDIVIDUALS; AND
2. IS ENGAGED IN A BUSINESS, AN INDUSTRY, A
PROFESSION, A TRADE, OR ANY OTHER ENTERPRISE IN THE STATE; OR
(II) A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT.
(5) “PARENT” MEANS AN ADOPTIVE, BIOLOGICAL, OR FOSTER
PARENT, A STEPPARENT, A LEGAL GUARDIAN, OR A PERSON STANDING IN LOCO
PARENTIS.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE EACH EMPLOYEE WHO IS A PARENT WITH AT LEAST 20
HOURS EACH YEAR OF LEAVE WITH PAY TO USE TO ATTEND A SCHOOL FUNCTION AT
THE PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL AT WHICH THE
EMPLOYEE’S CHILD IS ENROLLED.
(2) (I) AN EMPLOYEE MAY USE NOT MORE THAN 2 HOURS OF LEAVE
UNDER THIS SECTION EACH MONTH.
(II) TO QUALIFY AS A VALID USE OF THE LEAVE UNDER THIS
SECTION, AN EMPLOYEE SHALL SUBMIT PROOF OF THE SCHOOL FUNCTION TO THE
EMPLOYER WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE SCHOOL FUNCTION
OCCURS.
(3) AN EMPLOYER SHALL PAY AN EMPLOYEE WHO TAKES LEAVE
UNDER THIS SECTION AT THE SAME RATE OF PAY AS THE EMPLOYEE NORMALLY
EARNS.

HOUSE BILL 1524 3
(C) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE–PARENT TO USE
COMPENSATORY, SICK, OR VACATION LEAVE WHEN TAKING LEAVE UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(D) (1) AN EMPLOYEE WHO USES LEAVE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE TERMS OF A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT OR
EMPLOYMENT POLICY.
(2) IF THE TERMS OF A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT WITH
AN EMPLOYER OR AN EMPLOYMENT POLICY OF AN EMPLOYER PROVIDE A LEAVE
BENEFIT THAT IS EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN THE BENEFIT PROVIDED UNDER
THIS SECTION, THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT OR EMPLOYMENT
POLICY PREVAILS.
(E) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT AN EMPLOYER HAS
VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER
COMPELLING COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.